Tennessee statutes. Title 11 Natural Areas and Recreation
Part 2

Recreation Initiative Program

11-9-201. Short title.

The title of this part is and may be cited as the “Tennessee Recreation Initiative Program of 1995.”

Acts 1995, ch. 540, § 2.

11-9-202. Qualified applicants — Grants — Community matching.

Any city or county wishing to participate in this program may apply for funding through a competitive matching grant process as established by the department of environment and conservation's recreation services division.

Three (3) grants shall be awarded annually on the basis of need and population on a statewide basis, with one (1) award to be made in each grand division; provided, however, that, if, after the department notifies local governments of the availability of the grants, there are no applications from a grand division, then the department may award more than one (1) grant to a grand division. Any grant proposal that is based on a multi-government project shall have priority over all other projects submitted by a single governmental entity.

The state grants and the community's match shall be used to hire a professional recreation and park director, to furnish and establish a recreation office and to hire such other staff with professional or other appropriate qualifications as are needed.

The grant shall be for a three-year period.

During the first two (2) years in the program, the community shall match up to fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) from the state.

The third year in the program, the community is responsible for one hundred percent (100%) of the funding for the new program. If the community fails to fund the third year, the dollar value of total grants received would be owed to the state because of the community's failure to fulfill its contract.

After the third year, the community shall have no obligation to continue the program.

State support during the grant period shall include:

Assistance selecting professional staff;

Staff training;

Technical assistance on establishing a board or commission; and

Additional funding opportunities.

Acts 1995, ch. 540, § 3; 2006, ch. 595, §§ 1-3.

Cross-References. Grand divisions, title 4, ch. 1, part 2.

11-9-203. Budget.

The total budget for this program in its first year of operation shall be:

Three (3) new recreation programs at twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) each; and

Administrative costs of eight thousand dollars ($8,000) for each department;

for a total of ninety-nine thousand dollars ($99,000) expended by the state in the first year of the program.

The implementation of this part is subject to funding in the general appropriations act.

Acts 1995, ch. 540, § 4.